src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
LEXICON VIIn_PL_CNJ_TENSE !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ; !

!!! PERSON

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_NULL ;

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_NULL ;

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SGPL_FUT_CON_NULL ;

LEXICON VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SG_IND_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_PL_IND_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;

!! LEXICON VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
!! @U.person.NULL@ VIIw_IND_PL_SUFFIX ;
!! 
!! LEXICON VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
!! @U.person.NULL@ VIIw_CNJ_PL_SUFFIX ;
!! 
!! LEXICON VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
!! @U.person.NULL@ VIIw_FUT_CON_PL_SUFFIX ;

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_NULL ;

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_NULL ;

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SGPL_FUT_CON_NULL ;

LEXICON VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SG_IND_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ 
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_PL_IND_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON !!= @CODE@ plural only
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;

!!! SUFFIXES

! ********************
!!!! INDEPENDENT !!!!
! *********************


! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_IND_NULL !!= @CODE@
VIIn_SG_IND_SUFFIX ;
VIIn_PL_IND_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIn_SG_IND_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ singular
+3Sg:%>0 VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>iyiw VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VIIn_PL_IND_SUFFIX  !!= @CODE@ plural
+3Pl:%>wa VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>iyiwa VERB_ENDLEX ;

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================


LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_IND_NULL !!= @CODE@
VIIw_SG_IND_SUFFIX ;
VIIw_PL_IND_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIw_SG_IND_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ w final singular
+3Sg:%>w VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>yiw VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VIIw_PL_IND_SUFFIX  !!= @CODE@ w final plural
+3Pl:%>wa VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>yiwa VERB_ENDLEX ;


! ******************
!!!! CONJUNCT !!!!
! ******************


! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_NULL !!= @CODE@
VIIn_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
VIIn_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIn_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ singular
+3Sg:%>k VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>iyik VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VIIn_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX  !!= @CODE@ plural
+3Pl:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>iyiki VERB_ENDLEX ;

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_NULL !!= @CODE@
VIIw_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
VIIw_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIw_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ w final singular
+3Sg:%>k VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>yik VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VIIw_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ w final plural
+3Pl:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>yiki VERB_ENDLEX ;

! ****************************
!!!! FUTURE CONDITIONAL !!!!
! ****************************


! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_FUT_CON_NULL !!= @CODE@
VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ singular
+3Sg:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>iyiki VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX  !!= @CODE@ plural
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>iyikwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_FUT_CON_NULL !!= @CODE@
VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ w final singular
+3Sg:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>yiki VERB_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX   !!= @CODE@ w final plural
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>yikwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;


!! Intransitive animate (AI)
!      ===========================
!      ===========================

!!! AEW == Ours: VAIv == VAIw, VAIn == VAIn

!!! STEM CLASS
LEXICON VAIw
+V+AI: VAIae_WICI ;

LEXICON VAIw_PL !!= @CODE@ stems that end in â or ê
+V+AI: VAIw_PL_WICI ;

LEXICON VAIae !!= @CODE@ stems that end in â or ê
+V+AI: VAIae_WICI ;

LEXICON VAIio !!= @CODE@ stems that end in i, î, o, ô
+V+AI: VAIio_WICI ;

LEXICON VAIn !!= @CODE@ 
+V+AI: VAIn_WICI ;

LEXICON VAIn_PL !!= @CODE@ 
+V+AI: VAIn_PL_WICI ;

LEXICON VAIm !!= @CODE@ These are VTI3 in Arok's database
+V+AI:  VTIm_WICI ;

!!! WICI

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -w final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
!!!@@@!!! root.lexc: add Der/Com to multi char symbols
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VAIw_PL_WICI !!!! plural only
@U.wici.NULL@ VAIw_PL_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@%^COM%>i2m VTA_PL_ORDER ; ! ^COM used to trigger vowel lengthening at stem-im juncture

! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================
!!!!! -n final verbs (refers to the 3 SG form ending) !!!!!
! ===========================================================
! ===========================================================

LEXICON VERBSTEMS
apwêsiw:apwêsi VAIio ;
asêsin:asêsin3 VAIn ;
asisinwak:asisin3 VAIn_PL ;
asiwahiwêw:asiwahiwê VAIae ;
asohtêwak:asohtê VAIw_PL ;
awâsisihkâsow:awâsisihkâso VAIio ;
ayahowêw:aýahowê VAIae ;
âcimostâtowak:âcimostâto VAIw_PL ;
âcisin:âcisin3 VAIn ;
âhkospakosiw:âhkospakosi VAIio ;
âhtaskêw:âhtaskê VAIae ;
âmîw:âmî VAIio ;
âsokâmêham:âsokâmêha VAIm ;
âsowâsiw:âsowâsi VAIio ;
âstawêpicikêw:âstawêpicikê VAIae ;
âstêtâhtam:âstêtâhta VAIm ;
âtakâmakisin:âtakâmakisin3 VAIn ;
âyimôhtowak:âýimôhto VAIw_PL ;
cikâstêsin:cikâstêsin3 VAIn ;
cîstanihkwanâcikêw:cîstanihkwanâcikê VAIae ;
iskwâhitowak:iskwâhito VAIw_PL ;
ispapiw:ispapi VAIio ;
itâskocin:itâskocin3 VAIn ;
ititowak:itito VAIw_PL ;
kakwâyakâpahcikêw:kakwâýakâpahcikê VAIae ;
kakwêciyâhow:kakwêciýâho VAIio ;
kamâciwaham:kamâciwaha VAIm ;
kaskikwêsin:kaskikwêsin3 VAIn ;
kâsâpitêw:kâsâpitê VAIae ;
kâsînamâtowak:kâsînamâto VAIw_PL ;
kicimâkisiw:kicimâkisi VAIio ;
kipatâhtam:kipatâhta VAIm ;
kipihtakahikêw:kipihtakahikê VAIae ;
kiposin:kiposin3 VAIn ;
kiskêyihtowak:kiskêýihto VAIw_PL ;
kispakêkisiw:kispakêkisi VAIio ;
kistonêwêw:kistonêwê VAIae ;
kitotitowak:kitotito VAIw_PL ;
kîskikâtêw:kîskikâtê VAIae ;
kîskisin:kîskisin3 VAIn ;
kîskwêhkamikisiw:kîskwêhkamikisi VAIio ;
kîwêham:kîwêha VAIm ;
kotaskêham:kotaskêha VAIm ;
kwayaskohtowak:kwayaskohto VAIw_PL ;
kwayaskosi-ayâw:kwayaskosi-ayâ VAIae ;
kwêskakocin:kwêskakocin3 VAIn ;
kwêskiskwêpayihow:kwêskiskwêpaýiho VAIio ;
mahkatâhtam:mahkatâhta VAIm ;
manastimwêw:manastimwê VAIae ;
mawinêskâtowak:mawinêskâto VAIw_PL ;
mâcîw:mâcî VAIio ;
mâham:mâha VAIm ;
mâhiskam:mâhiska VAIm ;
mâhohtahiwêw:mâhohtahiwê VAIae ;
mâmawi-ayamihcikêwak:mâmawi-ayamihcikê VAIw_PL ;
mâmawi-mâtowak:mâmawi-mâto VAIw_PL ;
mâmawihitowak:mâmawihito VAIw_PL ;
mâmitonêyihtowak:mâmitonêýihto VAIw_PL ;
mâtâposinwak:mâtâposin3 VAIn_PL ;
mâtwêwêham:mâtwêwêha VAIm ;
mâyisin:mâýisin3 VAIn ;
mêscihiwêw:mêscihiwê VAIae ;
mihcêtiwak:mihcêti VAIw_PL ;
mihkowatâmow:mihkowatâmo VAIio ;
miskawâwêw:miskawâwê VAIae ;
miyâskâkêw:miýâskâkê VAIn ;
mîcisowamahcihow:mîcisowamahciho VAIio ;
mîskotahpititowak:mîskotahpitito VAIw_PL ;
mônahowêw:mônahowê VAIae ;
nanâtohkisiwak:nanâtohkisi VAIw_PL ;
nanimaham:nanimaha VAIm ;
nanimiskam:nanimiska VAIm ;
napakihtakohkâsow:napakihtakohkâso VAIio ;
napakisin:napakisin3 VAIn ;
napatêcihcêw:napatêcihcê VAIae ;
naskwaham:naskwaha VAIm ;
nataham:nataha VAIm ;
nâh-nîsohtêwak:nâh-nîsohtê VAIw_PL ;
nâmiwanaham:nâmiwanaha VAIm ;
nêhiyawascikêw:nêhiýawascikê VAIae ;
nihtâ-pakâsimow:nihtâ-pakâsimo VAIio ;
nihtâ-yâhyânam:nihtâ-ýâhýâna VAIm ;
nimitâwaham:nimitâwaha VAIm ;
nistokêwak:nistokê VAIw_PL ;
nistosinwak:nistosin3 VAIn_PL ;
nîhcikwâskwêsin:nîhcikwâskwêsin3 VAIn ;
nîpitêsinwak:nîpitêsin3 VAIn_PL ;
nîsokâpawiwak:nîsokâpawi VAIw_PL ;
nôtasâwâkanêw:nôtasâwâkanê VAIae ;
ocihcihkwanipayihow:ocihcihkwanipaýiho VAIio ;
ohtakocin:ohtakocin3 VAIn ;
opimîhkânimiw:opimîhkânimi VAIio ;
ostostotam:ostostota VAIm ;
otihtinitowak:otihtinito VAIw_PL ;
owâskahikaniw:owâskahikani VAIio ;
ôhôsimowaham:ôhôsimowaha VAIm ;
pakamisitêsin:pakamisitêsin3 VAIn ;
papâmicimêw:papâmicimê VAIae ;
pâh-pakwatêyihtâkosiw:pâh-pakwatêýihtâkosi VAIio ;
pê-takosin:pê-takosin3 VAIn ;
pêtwêwêtâhtam:pêtwêwêtâhta VAIm ;
pimâsiw:pimâsi VAIio ;
pimipayihcikêw:pimipaýihcikê VAIae ;
pisin:pisin3 VAIn ;
pîhtokêkocin:pîhtokêkocin3 VAIn ;
pîmakâmêham:pîmakâmêha VAIm ;
pônêyihtamâtowak:pônêýihtamâto VAIw_PL ;
pôsipayiw:pôsipaýi VAIio ;
sakicin:sakicin3 VAIn ;
sâkêwêw:sâkêwê VAIae ;
sikwâskocin:sikwâskocin3 VAIn ;
sîhkaciw:sîhkaci VAIio ;
tahkikamâpôhkêw:tahkikamâpôhkê VAIae ;
tahkohci-pahkisin:tahkohci-pahkisin3 VAIn ;
tahtwânakisiwak:tahtwânakisi VAIw_PL ;
taswêkakocin:taswêkakocin3 VAIn ;
tâpipiw:tâpipi VAIio ;
têpi-mâham:têpi-mâha VAIm ;
têwistikwânêsin:têwistikwânêsin3 VAIn ;
tipiskiskam:tipiskiska VAIm ;
wacîskâw:wacîskâ VAIae ;
waskitisin:waskitisin3 VAIn ;
wâpanisimow:wâpanisimo VAIio ;
wâsakâtisahotowak:wâsakâtisahoto VAIw_PL ;
wîhtamâtowak:wîhtamâto VAIw_PL ;
wîmâhâw:wîmâhâ VAIae ;
wînisiw:wînisi VAIio ;
yâhyânam:ýâhýâna VAIm ;
